Utah statutes.
53A-14-107.   Instructional materials alignment with core curriculum.
(1)  A school district may not purchase primary instructional materials unless
the primary instructional materials provider:
(a)  contracts with an independent party to evaluate and map the alignment of
the primary instructional materials with the core curriculum adopted under
Section 53A-1-402;
(b)  provides a detailed summary of the evaluation under Subsection (1)(a) on
a public website at no charge, for use by teachers and the general public; and
(c)  pays the costs related to the requirements of this Subsection (1).
(2)  The requirements under Subsection (1) may not be performed by:
(a)  the State Board of Education;
(b)  the superintendent of public instruction or the State Office of
Education;
(c)  the State Instructional Materials Commission appointed pursuant to
Section 53A-14-101;
(d) a local school board or a school district; or
(e)  the instructional materials creator or publisher.
(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules that establish:
(a)  the qualifications of the independent parties who may evaluate and map
the alignment of the primary instructional materials in accordance with the
provisions of Subsection (1)(a); and
(b)  requirements for the detailed summary of the evaluation and its placement
on a public website in accordance with the provisions of Subsection (1)(b).
